ru: Форма флага: Вымпел; Прямоугольник; Капля; Треугольный; Другой
ko: 깃발 모양: 페넌트; 직사각형; 티어드롭; 삼각형; 기타
hr-HR: Oblik zastave: Zastavica; Pravokutnik; Suza; Trokutasta; Ostalo
pt-PT: Formato da bandeira: Galhardete; Retangular; Em forma de lágrima; Triangular; Outro
bg-BG: Форма на знаме: Вимпел; Правоъгълен; Teardrop; Триъгълен; Други
es: Forma de la bandera: Banderín; Rectangular; Lágrima; Triangular; Otros
de: Flaggenform: Wimpel; Rechteckig; Träne; Dreieckig; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Forma da bandeira: Galhardete; Retangular; Mini-trailer; Triangular; Outro
fr: Forme du drapeau: Fanion; Rectangulaire; Mini-caravane; Triangulaire; Autre
nl: Vlagvorm: Wimpel; Rechthoekig; Traan; Driehoekig; Andere
tr: Bayrak şekli: Flama; Dikdörtgen; Gözyaşı; Üçgen şekilli; Diğer
it: Forma della bandiera: Guidone; Rettangolare; Goccia; Triangolare; Altro
vi: Hình lá cờ: Cờ đuôi nheo; Chữ nhật; Nhỏ gọn; Tam giác; Khác
en: Flag shape: Pennant; Rectangular; Teardrop; Triangular; Other
sk-SK: Tvar vlajky: Vývesný štít; Obdĺžnik; Slza; Trojuholník; Iné
da: Flagform: Vimpel; Rektangulær; Tåre; Trekantet; Andet
zh-CN: 旗帜形状: 三角旗; 矩形; 泪滴状; 三角形; 其他
sl-SI: Oblika zastave: Zastavica; Pravokotna; Kaplja; Trikotna; Drugo
fi: Lipun muoto: Viiri; Suorakulmainen; Kyynel; Kolmion muotoinen; Muu
hu: Zászló alakja: Jelzőzászló; Szögletes; Könnycsepp; Háromszögletű; Egyéb
el: Σχήμα σημαίας: Σημαιάκι; Ορθογώνιο; Δάκρυ; Τριγωνική; Άλλο
lt-LT: Vėliavos forma: Vimpelas; Stačiakampė; Lašo formos; Trikampė; Kita
sv: Flaggform: Vimpel; Rektangulär; Teardrop; Triangulär; Annat
ja: 旗の形状: ペナント; 長方形; ティアドロップ; 三角形; その他
ro-RO: Formă steag: Fanion; Dreptunghiular; Lacrimă; Triunghiular; Altele
zh-TW: 旗幟形狀: 三角旗; 長方形; 淚珠; 三角形; 其他
cs: Tvar vlajky: Praporek; Obdélníkový; Slza; Trojúhelníkový; Jiné
pl: Kształt flagi: Proporczyk; Prostokątna; Łza; Trójkątny; Pozostałe
th: รูปทรงของธง: ธงสามเหลี่ยม; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; หยดน้ำตา; แนวสามเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
nb: Flaggform: Vimpel; Rektangulær; Teardrop; Trekantet; Annen